Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.92.060

State need grant awards.

In awarding need grants, the office shall proceed substantially as follows: PROVIDED, That nothing contained herein shall be construed to prevent the office, in the exercise of its sound discretion, from following another procedure when the best interest of the program so dictates:

(1) The office shall annually select the financial aid award recipients from among Washington residents applying for student financial aid who have been ranked according to:

(a) College bound scholarship eligibility. Eligible students as defined in RCW 28B.118.010 who meet the requirements in *RCW 28B.118.010(4)(b)(i) for the college bound scholarship may not be denied state need grant funding due to institutional policies or delayed awarding of college bound scholarship students. College bound scholarship eligible students whose family income exceeds sixty-five percent of the state median family income, but who are eligible for the state need grant, shall be prioritized and awarded the maximum state need grant for which the student is eligible;

(b) Financial need as determined by the amount of the family contribution; and

(c) Other considerations, such as whether the student is a former foster youth, or is a placebound student who has completed an associate of arts or associate of science degree or its equivalent.

(2) The financial need of the highest ranked students shall be met by grants depending upon the evaluation of financial need until the total allocation has been disbursed. Funds from grants which are declined, forfeited or otherwise unused shall be reawarded until disbursed, except that eligible former foster youth shall be assured receipt of a grant. The office, in consultation with four-year institutions of higher education, the council, and the state board for community and technical colleges, shall develop award criteria and methods of disbursement based on level of need, and not solely rely on a first-come, first-served basis.

(3) A student shall be eligible to receive a state need grant for up to five years, or the credit or clock hour equivalent of five years, or up to one hundred twenty-five percent of the published length of time of the student's program. A student may not start a new associate degree program as a state need grant recipient until at least five years have elapsed since earning an associate degree as a need grant recipient, except that a student may earn two associate degrees concurrently. Qualifications for renewal will include maintaining satisfactory academic progress toward completion of an eligible program as determined by the office. Should the recipient terminate his or her enrollment for any reason during the academic year, the unused portion of the grant shall be returned to the state educational grant fund by the institution according to the institution's own policy for issuing refunds, except as provided in RCW 28B.92.070.

(4) In computing financial need, the office shall determine a maximum student expense budget allowance, not to exceed an amount equal to the total maximum student expense budget at the public institutions plus the current average state appropriation per student for operating expense in the public institutions. Any child support payments received by students who are parents attending less than half-time shall not be used in computing financial need.

(5)(a) A student who is enrolled in three to six credit-bearing quarter credits, or the equivalent semester credits, may receive a grant for up to one academic year before beginning a program that leads to a degree or certificate.

(b) An eligible student enrolled on a less-than-full-time basis shall receive a prorated portion of his or her state need grant for any academic period in which he or she is enrolled on a less-than-full-time basis, as long as funds are available.

(c) An institution of higher education may award a state need grant to an eligible student enrolled in three to six credit-bearing quarter credits, or the semester equivalent, on a provisional basis if:

(i) The student has not previously received a state need grant from that institution;

(ii) The student completes the required free application for federal student aid;

(iii) The institution has reviewed the student's financial condition, and the financial condition of the student's family if the student is a dependent student, and has determined that the student is likely eligible for a state need grant; and

(iv) The student has signed a document attesting to the fact that the financial information provided on the free application for federal student aid and any additional financial information provided directly to the institution is accurate and complete, and that the student agrees to repay the institution for the grant amount if the student submitted false or incomplete information.

(6) As used in this section, "former foster youth" means a person who is at least eighteen years of age, but not more than twenty-four years of age, who was a dependent of the department of social and health services at the time he or she attained the age of eighteen.

[ 2019 c 298 s 4; 2012 c 229 s 558. Prior: 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 162; 2011 1st sp.s. c 10 s 9; 2009 c 215 s 4; 2007 c 404 s 2; 2005 c 93 s 3; 2004 c 275 s 37; 1999 c 345 s 5; 1991 c 164 s 4; 1989 c 254 s 4; 1969 ex.s. c 222 s 12. Formerly RCW 28B.10.808, 28.76.470.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) RCW 28B.118.010 was amended by 2021 c 283 s 2, significantly changing subsection (4)(b)(i).

(2) RCW 28B.92.060 was amended by 2019 c 298 s 4 without cognizance of its repeal by 2019 c 406 s 79. For rule of construction concerning sections amended and repealed in the same legislative session, see RCW 1.12.025.

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Findings—Intent—Short title—2011 1st sp.s. c 10: See notes following RCW 28B.15.031.

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2009 c 215: See notes following RCW 28B.92.030.

Findings—Intent—2005 c 93: See note following RCW 74.13.570.

Part headings not law—2004 c 275: See note following RCW 28B.76.090.

Intent—1989 c 254: See note following RCW 28B.92.030.

PDFRCW 28B.92.060

State need grant awards.

[ 2012 c 229 s 558. Prior: 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 162; 2011 1st sp.s. c 10 s 9; 2009 c 215 s 4; 2007 c 404 s 2; 2005 c 93 s 3; 2004 c 275 s 37; 1999 c 345 s 5; 1991 c 164 s 4; 1989 c 254 s 4; 1969 ex.s. c 222 s 12. Formerly RCW 28B.10.808, 28.76.470.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: RCW 28B.92.060 was amended by 2019 c 298 s 4 without cognizance of its repeal by 2019 c 406 s 79. For rule of construction concerning sections amended and repealed in the same legislative session, see RCW 1.12.025.